Wisconsin, session 2025, AB996.
do enact as follows:AB996,11Section 1. 224.38 of the statutes is created to read:AB996,2,22224.38 Trump accounts. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB996,2,33(a) “Account beneficiary” has the meaning given in 26 USC 530A (b) (4).AB996,2,44(b) “Eligible child” has the meaning given in 26 USC 6434 (c).AB996,2,55(c) “Trump account” has the meaning given in 26 USC 530A (b) (1).AB996,2,96(2) Contribution pilot program. (a) Subject to par. (c), the department 7shall make a contribution to the Trump account of an eligible child who is the 8account beneficiary upon request in a form prescribed by the department and upon 9proof satisfactory to the department of all of the following:AB996,2,11101. A payment to the Trump account has been made as provided in 26 USC 116434 (a) and (b).AB996,2,13122. The eligible child was born in this state and resides in this state at the time 13of the department’s contribution.AB996,2,1614(b) Subject to par. (c), the amount of a contribution by the department under 15par. (a) shall be equal to the amount of the payment to the Trump account under 26 16USC 6434 (a) and (b).AB996,3,317(c) The department shall make contributions to Trump accounts under this 1subsection only to the extent that funds are available for the contributions. The 2department may not make a contribution to a Trump account under this subsection 3if the department previously made a contribution to the Trump account.AB996,3,54(d) A contribution under par. (a) is made as a qualified general contribution, 5as defined in 26 USC 530A (f) (1).AB996,3,66